lexd_components/hyx-added_kayayan.lexd
LEXICON NounReg
խլինդ:խլինդ
նմանող:նմանող
պրկուած:պրկուած
շուտ:շուտ
ազապ:ազապ
անդոհ:անդոհ
անեղ:անեղ
անեղ:անեղ
անզոյգ:անզոյգ
անկրօն:անկրօն
աշխէտ:աշխէտ
առանձնաշնորհ:առանձնաշնորհ
արբեցող:արբեցող
առաջնակարգ:առաջնակարգ
առունկնճառ:առունկնճառ
ձարի:ձարի
արամբի:արամբի
արու:արու
բազմաստեղք:բազմաստեղք
բայածական:բայածական
բարեխօս:բարեխօս
այծտերեւի:այծտերեւի
լուսանն:լուսանն
բացավայր:բացավայր
բութ:բութ
գահավէժ:գահավէժ
սպառող:սպառող
ծծկեր:ծծկեր
տեսնող:տեսնող
գերմակ:գերմակ
համակիր:համակիր
գրախօսական:գրախօսական
դահուկ:դահուկ
նպաստող:նպաստող
տաք:տաք
դեղուկ:դեղուկ
կղի:կղի
խնայող:խնայող
նախատեսող:նախատեսող
ամուր:ամուր
խնդամոլի:խնդամոլի
կակղի:կակղի
կամեցող:կամեցող
իջուած:իջուած
կարող:կարող
համակրող:համակրող
կատաղիք:կատաղիք
տողիք:տողիք
առաջնորդող:առաջնորդող
արտորայ:արտորայ
թաղեցիք:թաղեցիք
սպասաւորող:սպասաւորող
սրող:սրող
բրդեղէն:բրդեղէն
տափողն:տափողն
թելադրող:թելադրող
ծեծած:ծեծած
համբեր:համբեր
մակաղատեղի:մակաղատեղի
կրտած:կրտած
հասկացող:հասկացող
պաշտպանող:պաշտպանող
փափաքող:փափաքող
պարխրցի:պարխրցի
սալորի:սալորի
դժբաղդ:դժբաղդ
երգեցիկ:երգեցիկ
երեքժանի:երեքժանի
զանազանակ:զանազանակ
զարմանագեղ:զարմանագեղ
զենարան:զենարան
ընդեղէն:ընդեղէն
թունդ:թունդ
թուրծ:թուրծ
լիրբ:լիրբ
լծկան:լծկան
լուսաւոր:լուսաւոր
խաղաղասէր:խաղաղասէր
խայտ:խայտ
խման:խման
խորհրդակից:խորհրդակից
խուսափուկ:խուսափուկ
ծածկանուն:ծածկանուն
ծառայակից:ծառայակից
ծիրանաւոր:ծիրանաւոր
կաշառակեր:կաշառակեր
կաշմբուռն:կաշմբուռն
կատակախօս:կատակախօս
կեդրոնախոյս:կեդրոնախոյս
կոծադիր:կոծադիր
կոկոզանք:կոկոզանք
կոստնտոտիկ:կոստնտոտիկ
կոտակ:կոտակ
կրթիչ:կրթիչ
կրկնագիր:կրկնագիր
կրմուղ:կրմուղ
համարիչ:համարիչ
հասարակորդ:հասարակորդ
հարցափորձ:հարցափորձ
հիւթեղ:հիւթեղ
հլու:հլու
հողմայոյզ:հողմայոյզ
հոսանուտ:հոսանուտ
հում:հում
ձեռնատ:ձեռնատ
ձեռնկալ:ձեռնկալ
ձուաձեւ:ձուաձեւ
ճախճախուտ:ճախճախուտ
ճակ:ճակ
ճշմարտախօս:ճշմարտախօս
մազկարօտ:մազկարօտ
մազոտ:մազոտ
մահագոյժ:մահագոյժ
մատենախօսական:մատենախօսական
միաչեայ:միաչեայ
միջաբեկ:միջաբեկ
միջանկեալ:միջանկեալ
մողոշիկ:մողոշիկ
մռմռուկ:մռմռուկ
մօրուանի:մօրուանի
յետաշրջական:յետաշրջական
յիսնամեակ:յիսնամեակ
նախազգուշական:նախազգուշական
նետակերպ:նետակերպ
ննջեցեալ:ննջեցեալ
նորակառոյց:նորակառոյց
նուաղ:նուաղ
նօսր:նօսր
ողջիկ:ողջիկ
որոշ:որոշ
պահծու:պահծու
պատկան:պատկան
պարապ:պարապ
պարզ:պարզ
պարուհի:պարուհի
պինդ:պինդ
պսակաւոր:պսակաւոր
սմսեղուկ:սմսեղուկ
սնավաստակ:սնավաստակ
սրակն:սրակն
սրբազան:սրբազան
վայրարկու:վայրարկու
վանահայր:վանահայր
վաստակաւոր:վաստակաւոր
վերնոտ:վերնոտ
վիրաւորիչ:վիրաւորիչ
տապարաւոր:տապարաւոր
տարաբնակ:տարաբնակ
տպածոյ:տպածոյ
փարելի:փարելի
փարփառ:փարփառ
փեցի:փեցի
փրկարար:փրկարար
քանասար:քանասար
օդահան:օդահան
օդաչափ:օդաչափ
օրհներգու:օրհներգու
գառնազգեստ:գառնազգեստ
դատարկաբան:դատարկաբան
ընդվայրացած:ընդվայրացած
խաչապսշտ:խաչապսշտ
հազարամեայ:հազարամեայ
համայնաբուժ:համայնաբուժ
հելլեն:հելլեն
որթոտոքս:որթոտոքս
պչրանոյշ:պչրանոյշ
աղքատ:աղքատ
ամբարիշտ:ամբարիշտ
անաստուած:անաստուած
անդրանիկ:անդրանիկ
աչազուրկ:աչազուրկ
ասպնջական:ասպնջական
բացակայ:բացակայ
բնիկ:բնիկ
բօթաբեր:բօթաբեր
գաղափարապաշտ:գաղափարապաշտ
գիշերօթիկ:գիշերօթիկ
գնահատական:գնահատական
դիւահար:դիւահար
դրուժան:դրուժան
ըմպելի:ըմպելի
ընկեցիկ:ընկեցիկ
խելահաս:խելահաս
խեղանդամ:խեղանդամ
կաթոլիկ:կաթոլիկ
կակղամորթ:կակղամորթ
կարճահասակ:կարճահասակ
կնտակ:կնտակ
կոյր:կոյր
համայնագէտ:համայնագէտ
համր:համր
հասակակից:հասակակից
ձախ:ձախ
ձախակողմեան:ձախակողմեան
ճաղատ:ճաղատ
մահկանացու:մահկանացու
մաշկոտն:մաշկոտն
միածին:միածին
յապաղկոտ:յապաղկոտ
յաջող:յաջող
յղի:յղի
յորդորական:յորդորական
ներկայ:ներկայ
նորահաւատ:նորահաւատ
նորամուտ:նորամուտ
շաղփաղփ:շաղփաղփ
շիլ:շիլ
շուշտանդամ:շուշտանդամ
շռայլ:շռայլ
ոգեվար:ոգեվար
ոխակալ:ոխակալ
որակական:որակական
որովայնապարար:որովայնապարար
ուղղափառ:ուղղափառ
ունեւոր:ունեւոր
սկզբնատիպ:սկզբնատիպ
վշտակից:վշտակից
տեռատես:տեռատես
տնանկ:տնանկ
տնտեսական:տնտեսական
փսխեցուցիչ:փսխեցուցիչ
քռթենաւոր:քռթենաւոր
ակնդէտ:ակնդէտ
սորաբնակ:սորաբնակ
տարեկից:տարեկից
ցորեկօթիկ:ցորեկօթիկ
ցում:ցում
ադամախնձոր:ադամախնձոր
ազբ:ազբ
աթարոց:աթարոց
աթենաս:աթենաս
աթեր:աթեր
ալճէպրայ:ալճէպրայ
ախացել:ախացել
ախտաժամ:ախտաժամ
ակնակապիճ:ակնակապիճ
ակոնիտոն:ակոնիտոն
ակռափոչխիչ:ակռափոչխիչ
աղաղ:աղաղ
աղաւնիճ:աղաւնիճ
աղբիւսակալ:աղբիւսակալ
աղճկտատ:աղճկտատ
աղուհացք:աղուհացք
աղքար:աղքար
ամփիթատր:ամփիթատր
անգժատ:անգժատ
աշխարհահայեաց:աշխարհահայեաց
ապակեփեղկ:ապակեփեղկ
առաքոյթ:առաքոյթ
արգատ:արգատ
արդուզարդ:արդուզարդ
արեգնակ:արեգնակ
արեւնակ:արեւնակ
արծուեռունգն:արծուեռունգն
արճճուկ:արճճուկ
արքայասալոր:արքայասալոր
աւելամորթ:աւելամորթ
ափափայ:ափափայ
ափուճ:ափուճ
բախոց:բախոց
բաղբաք:բաղբաք
բամբիռ:բամբիռ
բանողչէք:բանողչէք
բասիլիկ:բասիլիկ
բարձք:բարձք
բերանոց:բերանոց
բնդեռ:բնդեռ
բուշ:բուշ
բռնայանգ:բռնայանգ
բրդոռ:բրդոռ
բրտոն:բրտոն
գելըրնակ:գելըրնակ
գետնաստղ:գետնաստղ
գերեգին:գերեգին
գերմաստ:գերմաստ
գլորուկ:գլորուկ
գոմշուկ:գոմշուկ
գործելի:գործելի
գործեւար:գործեւար
գորտնբուրդ:գորտնբուրդ
գութաներգ:գութաներգ
գուրշ:գուրշ
գրմունչ:գրմունչ
դդչիւն:դդչիւն
դեղփին:դեղփին
դիմածռիկ:դիմածռիկ
դսրովանք:դսրովանք
դրոյսք:դրոյսք
դրունազ:դրունազ
եգիպտոլոռ:եգիպտոլոռ
եզնայ:եզնայ
եզնարած:եզնարած
եթիայ:եթիայ
ելումուտք:ելումուտք
եղինձ:եղինձ
ետինք:ետինք
երնակ:երնակ
զարնուածք:զարնուածք
զսպակ:զսպակ
զտոց:զտոց
զօրանցք:զօրանցք
էշայծեամ:էշայծեամ
ընձեռայ:ընձեռայ
ընտրուկ:ընտրուկ
թակաղաղ:թակաղաղ
թամբակալ:թամբակալ
թայրաթոտ:թայրաթոտ
թաքչելուկ:թաքչելուկ
թելաշար:թելաշար
թթախտ:թթախտ
թթուածնատ:թթուածնատ
թղթածրար:թղթածրար
թոգան:թոգան
թօնընկէց:թօնընկէց
իդասար:իդասար
լամուկ:լամուկ
լայնաջիղ:լայնաջիղ
լիկիդոն:լիկիդոն
լճափ:լճափ
լոռքի:լոռքի
լուծք:լուծք
լուսաճճի:լուսաճճի
խաժմատ:խաժմատ
խաղանիշ:խաղանիշ
խաղավայր:խաղավայր
խաղբ:խաղբ
խաղճախուղճ:խաղճախուղճ
խամծեկ:խամծեկ
խանթեփար:խանթեփար
խանթուռ:խանթուռ
խարխափանք:խարխափանք
խարտոցուք:խարտոցուք
խաւեկ:խաւեկ
խզօն:խզօն
խինձ:խինձ
խլմուկ:խլմուկ
խլօպուզ:խլօպուզ
խծբծանք:խծբծանք
խնծիղ:խնծիղ
խնկողկուզիկ:խնկողկուզիկ
խոլխեցգետի:խոլխեցգետի
խոնջան:խոնջան
խոշրտուք:խոշրտուք
խոտամբար:խոտամբար
խուանք:խուանք
ծնգակապ:ծնգակապ
ծոնդ:ծոնդ
կազդոյր:կազդոյր
կալուածատոմար:կալուածատոմար
կախանցու:կախանցու
կախմահիճ:կախմահիճ
կանացիք:կանացիք
կանճրուկ:կանճրուկ
կապակցութին:կապակցութին
կապանջ:կապանջ
կաստան:կաստան
կարբ:կարբ
կարծրամաշկ:կարծրամաշկ
կարմիրտակ:կարմիրտակ
կարպետ:կարպետ
կաւառ:կաւառ
կեղծամաշկ:կեղծամաշկ
կենդաւրոս:կենդաւրոս
կեռլիկ:կեռլիկ
կեռօղակ:կեռօղակ
կերուք:կերուք
կերտուածք:կերտուածք
կըլըմպար:կըլըմպար
կինաբառիս:կինաբառիս
կիտր:կիտր
կլմպոշտիկ:կլմպոշտիկ
կծմնծուկ:կծմնծուկ
կղարթ:կղարթ
կղթկապ:կղթկապ
կճատ:կճատ
կոծախուր:կոծախուր
կոյադնդիռ:կոյադնդիռ
կոյզ:կոյզ
կոյշ:կոյշ
կոշկոճանք:կոշկոճանք
կովիկ:կովիկ
կովցնծուկ:կովցնծուկ
կոտտուք:կոտտուք
կոտրուք:կոտրուք
կուծուռի:կուծուռի
կունձ:կունձ
կունտուռ:կունտուռ
կուփուկ:կուփուկ
կոփոց:կոփոց
կռուինչ:կռուինչ
կտնտոց:կտնտոց
կրկներգ:կրկներգ
հազորան:հազորան
հալենի:հալենի
հաղբ:հաղբ
հաղորդասէր:հաղորդասէր
համաբարբառ:համաբարբառ
համածռիկ:համածռիկ
համետակալ:համետակալ
համտակ:համտակ
հայրապետարան:հայրապետարան
հանդերձարան:հանդերձարան
հանդիսավայր:հանդիսավայր
հասապարտ:հասապարտ
հարսնամատ:հարսնամատ
հարցանիշ:հարցանիշ
հացահատիկ:հացահատիկ
հաւատչեայ:հաւատչեայ
հեծուկ:հեծուկ
հերուենակ:հերուենակ
հեցք:հեցք
հիդրայ:հիդրայ
հոգեհատոր:հոգեհատոր
հոլ:հոլ
հոծիչ:հոծիչ
հողվայրք:հողվայրք
հորդայ:հորդայ
հորկ:հորկ
հորոն:հորոն
հրճրճուկ:հրճրճուկ
ձեռագիր:ձեռագիր
ձեռակապ:ձեռակապ
ձեռնպահ:ձեռնպահ
ձիւնհալք:ձիւնհալք
ձողապատուար:ձողապատուար
ճագոմ:ճագոմ
ճաթուք:ճաթուք
ճանառ:ճանառ
ճեղենակ:ճեղենակ
ճղորրան:ճղորրան
ճոյփ:ճոյփ
մազեկամաս:մազեկամաս
մաղունչ:մաղունչ
մաճուճիկ:մաճուճիկ
մանկ:մանկ
մանողակ:մանողակ
մաշկաւարզան:մաշկաւարզան
մաստասեղ:մաստասեղ
մատաղաձի:մատաղաձի
մատանեմատ:մատանեմատ
մատնաշուրթ:մատնաշուրթ
մարտամեքենայ:մարտամեքենայ
մարցու:մարցու
մեհենադրոշմ:մեհենադրոշմ
մեղրածծուկ:մեղրածծուկ
մզնատապ:մզնատապ
մթիթ:մթիթ
միջանիւ:միջանիւ
մոկոշ:մոկոշ
մոմլիկ:մոմլիկ
մոմոչ:մոմոչ
մռմուռ:մռմուռ
մսկուծ:մսկուծ
մսուտու:մսուտու
մրուան:մրուան
մրտիմ:մրտիմ
յանկարծաբան:յանկարծաբան
յառաջակողմ:յառաջակողմ
յաւելադիր:յաւելադիր
յետինեկ:յետինեկ
յերիւրանք:յերիւրանք
յուդա:յուդա
յօշարան:յօշարան
նադրոն:նադրոն
նախադուռ:նախադուռ
նախակէտ:նախակէտ
նախան:նախան
նախապտուղ:նախապտուղ
նախարտակ:նախարտակ
նառն:նառն
նաւրայ:նաւրայ
նետընկէց:նետընկէց
նիստուկաց:նիստուկաց
նիւսկեղդ:նիւսկեղդ
նուկտաւ:նուկտաւ
նումայ:նումայ
նունուփար:նունուփար
շեախ:շեախ
շինուածանիւթ:շինուածանիւթ
շնդեղ:շնդեղ
շողաձիգ:շողաձիգ
շողիկ:շողիկ
շոյանք:շոյանք
շոպակ:շոպակ
շուրջթատր:շուրջթատր
շռծակ:շռծակ
շռփող:շռփող
շտաղուկ:շտաղուկ
շտամբակ:շտամբակ
ողիմպական:ողիմպական
ոճոռք:ոճոռք
ոճրափորձ:ոճրափորձ
ոսկերոտի:ոսկերոտի
ոտնապարանջան:ոտնապարանջան
որթաճիւղ:որթաճիւղ
որսահետք:որսահետք
ուղեծուծ:ուղեծուծ
ույազ:ույազ
ուշք:ուշք
ուրական:ուրական
ուրջուհի:ուրջուհի
չորաթուզ:չորաթուզ
պահէզիկ:պահէզիկ
պայռիք:պայռիք
պայտիկ:պայտիկ
պանդրի:պանդրի
պաչիկ:պաչիկ
պապունիճ:պապունիճ
պաստեղ:պաստեղ
պատուտակ:պատուտակ
պատրինջ:պատրինջ
պատրուսանի:պատրուսանի
պարանխաղաց:պարանխաղաց
պարկուկ:պարկուկ
պարուսան:պարուսան
պարսէտ:պարսէտ
պարտանք:պարտանք
պաւուլիկ:պաւուլիկ
պեպէն:պեպէն
պերոզակ:պերոզակ
պիլիլիկ:պիլիլիկ
պիտեւան:պիտեւան
պլատիկ:պլատիկ
պղակունդագործ:պղակունդագործ
պռկօշ:պռկօշ
պտուկկոտրուկ:պտուկկոտրուկ
ջալ:ջալ
ջալուբիր:ջալուբիր
ջամբթակ:ջամբթակ
ջլախոտ:ջլախոտ
ջլան:ջլան
ջրայտուց:ջրայտուց
ջրառուոյտ:ջրառուոյտ
ջրբուխ:ջրբուխ
ջրցացտ:ջրցացտ
ռափաթայ:ռափաթայ
ռօշնայ:ռօշնայ
սաթիր:սաթիր
սախ:սախ
սաղմոն:սաղմոն
սարբինայ:սարբինայ
սարմուճակ:սարմուճակ
սարուփարթայ:սարուփարթայ
սաւառնարան:սաւառնարան
սաւառնորդ:սաւառնորդ
սերինոս:սերինոս
սէրոնսիր:սէրոնսիր
սիղեխ:սիղեխ
սիմինդր:սիմինդր
սիրտխառնուք:սիրտխառնուք
սնենի:սնենի
սոխարմատ:սոխարմատ
սողսողիկ:սողսողիկ
սուփար:սուփար
սպառնագիր:սպառնագիր
սպրդուք:սպրդուք
սռինչ:սռինչ
ստեղունք:ստեղունք
ստոյայ:ստոյայ
ստուգնաբերան:ստուգնաբերան
սրասրինգ:սրասրինգ
սօթ:սօթ
վաղենիկ:վաղենիկ
վերակնունք:վերակնունք
վերնասեմ:վերնասեմ
վիմուտք:վիմուտք
վիրախէժ:վիրախէժ
վլիտոն:վլիտոն
վշկապարիք:վշկապարիք
վռիկ:վռիկ
վտառք:վտառք
տալկ:տալկ
տախտակազմած:տախտակազմած
տակուք:տակուք
տանջարան:տանջարան
տաշտիպարան:տաշտիպարան
տառեղ:տառեղ
տափոլոռ:տափոլոռ
տեռք:տեռք
տզզիւն:տզզիւն
տզկանափայտ:տզկանափայտ
տիգոսկր:տիգոսկր
տինկ:տինկ
տիրոյթ:տիրոյթ
տկճոր:տկճոր
տկուք:տկուք
տնեցի:տնեցի
տոչորակ:տոչորակ
տորփ:տորփ
տորք:տորք
տուտր:տուտր
տոփ:տոփ
տռտռուք:տռտռուք
տտներեր:տտներեր
տրոհակ:տրոհակ
տրոքիղոս:տրոքիղոս
ցախսարիկ:ցախսարիկ
ցայտուկ:ցայտուկ
ցորենածաղիկ:ցորենածաղիկ
ցցաշար:ցցաշար
փակոյց:փակոյց
փամփշտուկ:փամփշտուկ
փարտիչ:փարտիչ
փէճ:փէճ
փթեր:փթեր
փիննայ:փիննայ
փիւրիտ:փիւրիտ
փշարմաւ:փշարմաւ
փշտիկ:փշտիկ
փորահաւ:փորահաւ
փորանկած:փորանկած
փուքսիայ:փուքսիայ
փռչիկ:փռչիկ
փրցլիք:փրցլիք
քաղելուկ:քաղելուկ
քարհատ:քարհատ
քարտափայտ:քարտափայտ
քթառիչ:քթառիչ
քներգ:քներգ
քուէխոյզ:քուէխոյզ
քուշտընգիր:քուշտընգիր
քուռթէշ:քուռթէշ
քսիստին:քսիստին
քրչաքաղ:քրչաքաղ
օձաձուկ:օձաձուկ
օձասխտոր:օձասխտոր
օրերք:օրերք

LEXICON CausativeVerbRoot
անշարժացնել:անշարժա
կայունացնել:կայունա
ուռճացնել:ուռճա
վաստկեցնել:վաստկե
կսկծեցնել:կսկծե
ապշեցնել:ապշե
բանեցնել:բանե
դադրեցնել:դադրե
զբաղեցնել:զբաղե
զմայլեցնել:զմայլե
ցոլացնել:ցոլա
փակցնել:փակ
փլցնել:փլ
կակղացնել:կակղա
իջեցնել:իջե

LEXICON NounUtjunSuffix
անսանձութիւն:անսանձ
անսիրելութիւն:անսիրել
ատենախօսութիւն:ատենախօս
բացսրտութիւն:բացսրտ
բնաձայնութիւն:բնաձայն
գծծութիւն:գծծ
կամայականութիւն:կամայական
կամշոտութիւն:կամշոտ
կանխորոշութիւն:կանխորոշ
համախռնութիւն:համախռն
հանգստաւէտութիւն:հանգստաւէտ
հանճարամտութիւն:հանճարամտ
հաւաքականութիւն:հաւաքական
մկնաձգտութիւն:մկնաձգտ
շոշորթութիւն:շոշորթ
պանծութիւն:պանծ
սովորամոլութիւն:սովորամոլ
վերակենդանութիւն:վերակենդան
փութկոտութիւն:փութկոտ

LEXICON NounUmSuffix
ոզում:ոզ
բարեշրջում:բարեշրջ
բարոյալքում:բարոյալք
թերացում:թերաց
մսխում:մսխ
պատկերացում:պատկերաց
յեղում:յեղ
վէտվիտում:վէտվիտ
խմբում:խմբ
ունկնդրում:ունկնդր
խռնում:խռն

LEXICON InchRoot(2)
արձանանալ:արձանա <iv>
դաշտանալ:դաշտա <iv>
խենթենալ:խենթե <iv>
գուլնալ:գուլ <iv>
լմննալ:լմն <iv>
կամենալ:կամե <iv>
կարողանալ:կարողա <iv>
մոռնալ:մոռ <iv>
սաստկանալ:սաստկա <iv>
կուրանալ:կուրա <tv> 
մարգարէանալ:մարգարէա <tv> 
սխրանալ:սխրա <tv> 
մերկանալ:մերկա <tv> 

LEXICON PassiveVerbRoot
տպաւորուիլ:տպաւոր
պառուիլ:պառ
գրաւուիլ:գրաւ
արտայայտուիլ:արտայայտ
լարուիլ:լար
խճողուիլ:խճող
կթուիլ:կթ
համարուիլ:համար

LEXICON VerbRootA(2)
կըլկըլալ:կըլկըլ <iv>
ճզալ:ճզ <iv>
նվնվալ:նվնվ <iv>
որոշտալ:որոշտ <iv>
ճողալ:ճող <iv>
ափսոսալ:ափսոս <tv>
լուտալ:լուտ <tv>
խշխշալ:խշխշ <tv>
պղպջալ:պղպջ <tv>
օթալ:օթ <iv>
բաղձալ:բաղձ <iv>
գրգալ:գրգ <iv>
ըղձալ:ըղձ <iv>
խանդալ:խանդ <iv>
ճօշալ:ճօշ <iv>
մրթմրթալ:մրթմրթ <iv>
ցանկալ:ցանկ <iv>
